Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.050

Vacancies—Quorum—Compensation—Travel expenses.

In the event a position becomes vacant due to resignation, disqualification, death, or for any other reason, such position shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term by appointment by the director from at least two nominees submitted by the remaining members of the commission.

A majority of the voting members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business and the carrying out of the duties of the commission.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.230 and shall be reimbursed for actual travel expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Employees of the commission may also be reimbursed for actual travel expenses when on official commission business.

[ 2004 c 178 s 7; 2002 c 313 s 118; 1984 c 287 s 12; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 12; 1967 c 240 s 26; 1961 c 11 s 15.24.050. Prior: 1949 c 191 s 1, part; 1937 c 195 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 2874-3, part.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.